Hawaii statutes.
§281-108 Search warrants; seizure. If
any person makes complaint, supported by oath, before any district or circuit
judge, setting forth facts sufficient to show probable cause that any liquor is
being manufactured or kept or deposited for sale or distribution contrary to
law within the judge's jurisdiction in any house, premises, or place, or that
any such liquor is lodged or contained in any vehicle for transportation by
land, water, or air, the judge shall issue a warrant, directed to any sheriff,
chief of police, police officer, or investigator, commanding the sheriff, chief
of police, police officer, or investigator to search the premises, place, or
vehicle described in the complaint. If any intoxicating liquor is found
therein under circumstances warranting the belief of the officer that it is
being manufactured or is intended for sale or distribution contrary to law, the
officer acting under the warrant shall seize and convey the liquor and any land
vehicle in which the same is found to some place of security and keep the same
until final action is had thereon. When, in case of any entry, it is found
that liquor is there being manufactured contrary to this chapter the officer
may likewise seize and convey the same to some place of security and keep it
until final action is had thereon. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §67; RL 1935, §2635; RL
1945, §7287; RL 1955, §159-105; HRS §281-108; am L 1970, c 188, §39; gen ch
1985; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 171, §35 and c 281, §11]

Revision Note

"District or circuit judge" substituted for
"magistrate or judge" and further reference to "magistrate"
deleted pursuant to L 1970, c 188.

Cross References

Arrests, search warrants, see chapter 803.

Rules of Court

Search warrants, see HRPP rule 41.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next